California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(History: Repealed (in Sec. 18) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 19.   (SB 326)   Effective April 17, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the March 5, 2024, election.     Operative January 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5604.3.

(a) (1) The board of supervisors may pay from available funds the actual and necessary expenses of the members of the behavioral health board of a community mental health service incurred incident to the performance of their official duties and functions.

(2) The expenses may include travel, lodging, childcare, and meals for the members of the board while on official business as approved by the director of the local behavioral health program.

(b) Governing bodies are encouraged to provide a budget for the local behavioral health board using planning and administrative revenues
 identified in
 paragraph (1) of subdivision (e)
 of Section 5892, that is sufficient to facilitate the purpose, duties, and responsibilities of the local behavioral health board.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2025, if amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 20) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 21.   (SB 326)   Effective April 17, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the March 5, 2024, election.     Operative January 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5604.5.

The local behavioral health board shall develop bylaws to be approved by the governing body that shall do all of the following:

(a) Establish the specific number of members on the behavioral health board, consistent with subdivision (a) of Section 5604.

(b) Ensure that the composition of the behavioral health board represents and reflects the diversity and demographics of the county as a whole, to the extent feasible.

(c) Establish that a quorum be one person more than one-half of the appointed members.

(d) Establish that the chairperson of the behavioral health board be in consultation with the local behavioral health director.

(e) Establish that there may be an executive committee of the behavioral health board.

(f) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2025, if amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 22) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 23.   (SB 326)   Effective April 17, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the March 5, 2024, election.     Operative January 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5607.

The local mental health services shall be administered by a local director of mental health services to be appointed by the governing body. He or she shall meet such standards of training and experience as the State Department of Health Care Services, by regulation, shall require. Applicants for these positions
 need not be residents of the city, county, or state, and may be employed on a full or part-time basis. If a county is unable to secure the services of a person who meets the standards of the State Department of Health Care Services, the county may select an alternate administrator.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 119.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

5608.

The local director of mental health services shall have the following powers and duties:

(a) Serve as chief executive officer of the community mental health service responsible to the governing body through administrative channels designated by the governing body. 

(b) Exercise general supervision over mental health services provided under this part. 

(c) Recommend to the governing body, after consultation with the advisory board, the provision of services, establishment of facilities, contracting for services or facilities and other matters necessary or desirable in accomplishing the purposes of this division. 

(d) Submit an annual report to the governing body reporting all activities of the program, including a financial accounting of expenditures and a forecast of anticipated needs for the ensuing year. 

(e) Carry on studies appropriate for the discharge of his or her duties, including the control and prevention of mental disorders. 

(f) Possess authority to enter into negotiations for contracts or agreements for the purpose of providing mental health services in the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 89, Sec. 92.   Effective June 30, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

5610.

(a) Each county mental health system shall comply with reporting requirements developed by the State Department of Health Care Services, in consultation with the California Behavioral Health Planning Council and the Mental Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission, which shall be uniform and simplified. The department shall review existing data requirements to eliminate unnecessary requirements and consolidate requirements that are necessary. These requirements shall provide comparability between counties in reports.

(b) The department shall develop, in consultation with the Performance Outcome Committee, the California Behavioral Health Planning Council, and the Mental
 Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission, pursuant to Section 5611, and with the California Health and Human Services Agency, uniform definitions and formats for a statewide, nonduplicative client-based information system that includes all information necessary to meet federal mental health grant requirements and state and federal Medicaid reporting requirements, and any other state requirements established by law. The data system, including performance outcome measures reported pursuant to Section 5613, shall be developed by July 1, 1992.

(c) Unless determined necessary by the department to comply with federal law and regulations, the data system developed pursuant to subdivision (b) shall not be more costly than that in place during the 1990–91 fiscal year.

(d) (1) The department shall develop unique client identifiers that permit development of client-specific cost and outcome measures and related research and analysis.

(2) The department’s collection and use of client information, and the development and use of client identifiers, shall be consistent with clients’ constitutional and statutory rights to privacy and confidentiality.

(3) Data reported to the department may include name and other personal identifiers. That information is confidential and subject to Section 5328 and any other state and federal laws regarding confidential client information.

(4) Personal client identifiers reported to the department shall be protected to
 ensure confidentiality during transmission and storage through encryption and other appropriate means.

(5) Information reported to the department may be shared with local public mental health agencies submitting records for the same person and that information is subject to Section 5328.

(e) All client information reported to the department pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 4030) of Part 1 of Division 4, Sections 5328 to 5772.5, inclusive, Chapter 8.9 (commencing with Section 14700) of Part 3 of Division 9, and any other state and federal laws regarding reporting requirements, consistent with Section 5328, shall not be used for purposes other than those purposes expressly stated in the reporting requirements referred to in this subdivision.

(f) The department may adopt emergency regulations to implement this section in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). The adoption of emergency regulations to implement this section that are filed with the Office of Administrative Law within one year of the date on which the act that added this subdivision took effect shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare and shall remain in effect for no more than 180 days.

(g) If amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election, this section shall become
 inoperative on July 1, 2026, and as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 24.   (SB 326)   Effective October 12, 2023.   Inoperative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 25 of Stats. 2023, Ch. 790.)
-------------------------------------------

5610.

(a) (1) Each county behavioral health system shall comply with reporting requirements developed by the State Department of Health Care Services, in consultation with the California Behavioral Health Planning Council and the Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission, which shall be uniform and simplified.

(2) The department shall review existing data requirements to eliminate unnecessary requirements and consolidate requirements that are necessary.

(3) These requirements shall provide comparability between counties in reports.

(b) (1) The department and the California
 Health and Human Services Agency shall develop, in consultation with the Performance Outcome Committee and the California Behavioral Health Planning Council, pursuant to Section 5611, as well as the Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission, uniform definitions and formats for a statewide, nonduplicative, client-based information system that includes all information necessary to meet federal mental health grant requirements, state and federal Medicaid reporting requirements, and other state requirements established by law.

(2) The data system, including performance outcome measures reported pursuant to Section 5613, shall be developed by July 1, 1992.

(c) Unless determined necessary by the department to comply with federal law and regulations, the data system developed pursuant to subdivision (b) shall not be more costly than that in place during the
 1990–91 fiscal year.

(d) (1) The department shall develop unique client identifiers that permit development of client-specific cost and outcome measures and related research and analysis.

(2) The department’s collection and use of client information, and the development and use of client identifiers, shall be consistent with clients’ constitutional and statutory rights to privacy and confidentiality.

(3) (A) Data reported to the department may include name and other personal identifiers.

(B) That information is confidential and subject to Section 5328 and any other state and federal law regarding confidential client information.

(4) Personal
 client identifiers reported to the department shall be protected to ensure confidentiality during transmission and storage through encryption and other appropriate means.

(5) (A) Information reported to the department may be shared with local public behavioral health agencies submitting records for the same person.

(B) The information described in this paragraph is subject to Section 5328.

(e) All client information reported to the department pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 4030) of Part 1 of Division 4 and Sections 5328 to 5772, inclusive, Chapter 8.9 (commencing with Section 14700), and any other state and federal law regarding reporting requirements, consistent with Section 5328, shall not be used for purposes other than those purposes expressly stated in the reporting
 requirements referred to in this subdivision.

(f) The department may adopt emergency regulations to implement this section in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). The adoption of emergency regulations to implement this section that are filed with the Office of Administrative Law within one year of the date on which the act that added this subdivision took effect shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare and shall remain in effect for no more than 180 days.

(g) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2026, if amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary
 election.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 25) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 191.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Operative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5611.

(a) The Director of State Hospitals shall establish a Performance Outcome Committee, to be comprised of representatives from the Public Law 99-660 Planning Council and the County Behavioral Health Directors Association of California. Any costs associated with the performance of the duties of the committee shall be absorbed within the resources of the participants.

(b) Major mental health professional organizations representing licensed clinicians may participate as members of the committee at their own expense.

(c) The committee may seek private funding for costs associated with the performance of its
 duties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 455, Sec. 33.   (SB 804)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

5612.

(a) (1) The Performance Outcome Committee shall develop measures of performance for evaluating client outcomes and cost effectiveness of mental health services provided pursuant to this division. The reporting of performance measures shall utilize the data collected by the State Department of Mental Health in the client-specific, uniform, simplified, and consolidated data system. The performance measures shall take into account resources available overall, resource imbalance between counties, other services available in the community, and county experience in developing data and evaluative information.

(2) During the 1992–93 fiscal year, the committee shall include measures of performance for evaluating client outcomes and cost-effectiveness of mental health services provided by state hospitals.

(b) The committee should consider outcome measures in the following areas:

(1) Numbers of persons in identified target populations served. 

(2) Estimated number of persons in identified target populations in need of services. 

(3) Treatment plans development for members of the target population served.

(4) Treatment plan goals met. 

(5) Stabilization of living arrangements. 

(6) Reduction of law enforcement involvement and jail bookings.

(7) Increase in employment or education activities. 

(8) Percentage of resources used to serve children and older adults. 

(9) Number of patients’ rights advocates and their duties. 

(10) Quality assurance activities for services, including peer review and medication management. 

(11) Identification of special projects, incentives, and prevention programs. 

(c) Areas identified for consideration by the committee are for guidance only.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1374, Sec. 30.   Effective October 28, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

5613.

(a) Counties shall annually report data on performance measures established pursuant to Section 5612 to the local mental health advisory board and to the Director of Health Care Services.

(b) The Director of Health Care Services shall annually make data on county performance available to the Legislature, and post that data on the department’s Internet Web site, by no later than March 15 of each year.

(c) If amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election, this section shall become inoperative on January 1, 2025, and as of January 1, 2027, is
 repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 26.   (SB 326)   Effective October 12, 2023.   Inoperative January 1, 2025, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 27 of Stats. 2023, Ch. 790.)
-------------------------------------------

5613.

(a) Counties shall annually report data on performance measures established pursuant to Section 5612 to the local behavioral health board and to the Director of Health Care Services.

(b) The Director of Health Care Services shall annually make data on county performance available to the Legislature and post that data on the department’s internet website by no later than March 15 of each year.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2025, if amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 26) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 27.   (SB 326)   Effective October 12, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5614.

(a) The department, in consultation with the Compliance Advisory Committee that shall have representatives from relevant stakeholders, including, but not limited to, local behavioral health departments, local behavioral health boards and commissions, private and community-based providers, consumers and family members of consumers, local educational agency representatives including, but not limited to, educators and school staff, and advocates, shall establish a protocol for ensuring that local behavioral health departments meet statutory and regulatory requirements for the provision of publicly funded community mental health services provided under this part.

(b) The protocol shall include a procedure for review and assurance of compliance for all of the following elements, and any other element required in law or regulation:

(1) Financial maintenance of effort requirements provided for under Section 17608.05.

(2) Each local behavioral health board has approved procedures that ensure citizen and professional involvement in the local mental health and substance use disorder planning process.

(3) Children’s services are funded pursuant to the requirements of Sections 5704.5 and 5704.6.

(4) The local behavioral health department complies with reporting requirements developed by the department.

(5) To the extent resources are available, the local behavioral health department maintains the program principles and the array of treatment options required under Sections 5600.2 to 5600.9, inclusive.

(6) The local behavioral health department meets the reporting required by the performance outcome systems for adults and children.

(c) (1) The protocol developed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall focus on law and regulations and shall include, but not be limited to, the items specified in subdivision (b).

(2) The protocol shall include data collection procedures so that state review and reporting may occur.

(3) The protocol shall also include a procedure for the provision of technical assistance and formal decision rules and procedures for enforcement consequences when the requirements of law and regulations are not met.

(4) These standards and decision rules shall be established through the consensual stakeholder process established by the department.

(d) If amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election, this section shall become inoperative on January 1, 2025, and as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 28.   (SB 326)   Effective April 17, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the March 5, 2024, election.     Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Sec. 117 of Proposition 1.   Inoperative January 1, 2025, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 29 of Stats. 2023, Ch. 790.)
-------------------------------------------

5614.

(a) The department, in consultation with the Compliance Advisory Committee that shall have representatives from relevant stakeholders, including, but not limited to, local behavioral health departments, local behavioral health boards and commissions, private and community-based providers, consumers and family members of consumers, local education agency representatives including, but not limited to, educators and school staff, and advocates, shall establish a protocol for ensuring that local behavioral health departments meet statutory and regulatory requirements for the provision of publicly funded community mental health services provided under this part.

(b) The protocol shall include a procedure for review and assurance of compliance for all of the following elements, and any other element required in law or regulation:

(1) Financial maintenance of effort requirements provided for under Section 17608.05.

(2) Each local behavioral health board has approved procedures that ensure citizen and professional involvement in the local mental health and substance use disorder planning process.

(3) Children’s services are funded pursuant to the requirements of Sections 5704.5 and 5704.6.

(4) The local behavioral health department complies with reporting requirements developed by the department.

(5) To the extent resources are available, the local behavioral health department maintains the program principles and the array of treatment options required under Sections 5600.2 to 5600.9, inclusive.

(6) The local behavioral health department meets the reporting required by the performance outcome systems for adults and children.

(c) (1) The protocol
 developed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall focus on law and regulations and shall include, but not be limited to, the items specified in subdivision (b).

(2) The protocol shall include data collection procedures so that state review and reporting may occur.

(3) The protocol shall also include a procedure for the provision of technical assistance, and formal decision rules and procedures for enforcement consequences when the requirements of law and regulations are not met.

(4) These standards and decision rules shall be established through the consensual stakeholder process established by the department.

(d) This section shall become operative on January 1,
 2025, if amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 29.   (SB 326)   Effective April 17, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the March 5, 2024, election.     Operative January 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5614.5.

(a) The department, in consultation with the Quality Improvement Committee which shall include representatives of the California Behavioral Health Planning Council, local mental health departments, consumers and families of consumers, and other stakeholders, shall establish and measure indicators of access and quality to provide the information needed to continuously improve the care provided in California’s public mental health system.

(b) The department in consultation with the Quality Improvement Committee shall include specific indicators in all of the following areas:

(1) Structure.

(2) Process, including access to care, appropriateness of care, and the cost effectiveness of care.

(3) Outcomes.

(c) Protocols for both compliance with law and regulations and for quality indicators shall include standards and formal decision rules for establishing when technical assistance, and enforcement in the case of compliance, will occur. These standards and decision rules shall be established through the consensual stakeholder process established by the department.

(d) The department shall report to the legislative budget committees on the status of the efforts in Section 5614 and this section by March 1, 2001. The report
 shall include presentation of the protocols and indicators developed pursuant to this section or barriers encountered in their development.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 511, Sec. 7.   (AB 1688)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

5615.

If they so elect, cities that were operating independent public mental health programs on January 1, 1990, shall continue to receive direct payments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 89, Sec. 102.   Effective June 30, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

5616.

Nothing in this part shall prevent any city or combination of cities from owning, financing, and operating a mental health program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 89, Sec. 104.   Effective June 30, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

5618.

Mental health plans shall be responsible for providing information to potential clients, family members, and caregivers regarding specialty Medi-Cal mental health services offered by the mental health plans upon request of the individual. This information shall be written in a manner that is easy to understand and is descriptive of the complete services offered.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 93, Sec. 53.   Effective July 7, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

5622.

(a) A licensed inpatient mental health facility, as described in subdivision (c) of Section 1262 of the Health and Safety Code, operated by a county or pursuant to a county contract, shall, prior to the discharge of any patient who was placed in the facility, prepare a written aftercare plan. The aftercare plan, to the extent known, shall specify the following:

(1) The nature of the illness and followup required.

(2) Medications, including side effects and dosage schedules. If the patient was given an informed consent form with his or her medications, the form shall satisfy the requirement for information on side effects of the medications.

(3) Expected course of recovery.

(4) Recommendations regarding treatment that are relevant to the patient’s care.

(5) Referrals to providers of medical and mental health services.

(6) Other relevant information.

(b) Any person undergoing treatment at a facility under the Lanterman-Petris-Short Act or a county Bronzan-McCorquodale facility and the person’s conservator, guardian, or other legally authorized representative shall be given a written aftercare plan prior to being discharged from the facility. The person shall be advised by facility personnel that he or she may designate another person to receive a copy of the aftercare plan.

(c) A copy of the aftercare plan shall be given to any person designated under subdivision (b). A patient who is released from any local treatment facility described in subdivision (c) of Section 1262 of the Health and Safety Code on a voluntary basis may refuse any or all services under the written aftercare plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 512, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

5623.5.

Commencing October 1, 1991, and to the extent resources are available, no county shall deny any person receiving services administered by the county mental health program access to any medication which has been prescribed by the treating physician and approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration and the Medi-Cal program for use in the treatment of psychiatric illness.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 89, Sec. 107.   Effective June 30, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

5623.6.

(a) Individuals who have been found incompetent to stand trial and whose charges have been dismissed by the court pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 1370.01 of the Penal Code and who are not receiving court directed services pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1370.01 of the Penal Code, represent a vulnerable population who would benefit from on-going mental health services. It is the intent of the Legislature that this population shall be a top priority for connection with behavioral health services upon release.

(b) An individual who has a misdemeanor charge or charges that are dismissed by the court, who is found incompetent to stand trial,
 and who is not receiving court directed services pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1370.01 of the Penal Code, shall be notified by the court of their need for mental health services, as evidenced by having been found incompetent to stand trial. The court shall additionally provide the individual with information that, at a minimum, consists of the name, address, and telephone number of the county behavioral health department, the name and contact information of the behavioral health professional that was providing services to them while incarcerated, if any, contact information for the Medi-Cal program, and a list of available community-based organizations where the individual could obtain mental health services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 883, Sec. 1.   (SB 717)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. The County Performance Contract [5650. - 5667.]

5650.

(a) The State Department of Health Care Services and each county shall have a performance contract for community mental health services, the Mental Health Services Act, the Projects for Assistance in Transition from Homelessness grant, the Community Mental Health Services Block Grant, and other federal grants or other county mental health programs.

(b) The department shall develop the county mental health services performance contract, which shall be effective for an initial period of three years. The department shall provide the three-year performance contract to the county by January 2 of the year the existing performance contract expires. The county shall adopt,
 execute, and return the performance contract by May 1 of the year the existing contract expires.

(c) The department may extend the term of the contract for two one-year periods. If the department extends the term of the performance contract, the department shall notify the county by January 2 of the year the existing performance contract expires. The county shall adopt, execute, and return the extension to the performance contract by May 1 of the year the existing contract expires.

(d) The department may amend the contract at any time during the term of the contract and the county shall have 90 days from receipt of an amendment to adopt, execute, and return the amendment to the department.

(e) For the
 purposes of this chapter, provisions of law referring to the county shall be construed to include counties, counties acting jointly, and cities receiving funds pursuant to Section 5701.5.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 424, Sec. 13.   (SB 1495)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

5650.5.

Any other provision of law referring to the county Short-Doyle plan shall be construed as referring to the county mental health services performance contract described in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 89, Sec. 113.   Effective June 30, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

5651.

(a) Counties shall comply with the terms of the county mental health services performance contract.

(b) The county mental health services performance contract shall include all of the following provisions:

(1) That the county shall comply with the expenditure requirements of Section 17608.05.

(2) That the county shall provide services to persons receiving involuntary treatment as required by Part 1 (commencing with Section 5000) and Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 5585).

(3) That the county shall
 comply with all requirements necessary for Medi-Cal reimbursement for mental health treatment services and case management programs provided to Medi-Cal eligible individuals, including, but not limited to, the provisions set forth in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5700), and that the county shall submit cost reports and other data to the department in the form and manner determined by the State Department of Health Care Services.

(4) That the local mental health advisory board has reviewed and approved procedures ensuring citizen and professional involvement at all stages of the planning process pursuant to Section 5604.2.

(5) That the county shall comply with all provisions and requirements in law pertaining to patient rights.

(6) That the county shall comply with all requirements in federal law and regulation, and all agreements, certifications, assurances, and policy letters, pertaining to federally funded mental health programs, including, but not limited to, the Projects for Assistance in Transition from Homelessness grant and Community Mental Health Services Block Grant programs.

(7) That the county shall provide all data and information set forth in Sections 5610 and 5664.

(8) That the county, if it elects to provide the services described in Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 5670), shall comply with guidelines established for program initiatives outlined in that chapter.

(9) That the county shall comply with all applicable laws and regulations for all services delivered, including all laws, regulations, and guidelines of the Mental Health Services Act.

(10) The State Department of Health Care Services’ ability to monitor the county’s three-year program and expenditure plan and annual update pursuant to Section 5847.

(11) Other information determined to be necessary by the director, to the extent this requirement does not substantially increase county costs.

(c) The State Department of Health Care Services may include contract provisions for other federal grants or county mental health programs in this performance
 contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 424, Sec. 14.   (SB 1495)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

5652.5.

(a) Each county shall utilize available private and private nonprofit mental health resources and facilities in the county prior to developing new county-operated resources or facilities when these private and private nonprofit mental health resources or facilities are of at least equal quality and cost as county-operated resources and facilities and shall utilize available county resources and facilities of at least equal quality and cost prior to new private and private nonprofit resources and facilities. All the available local public or private and private nonprofit facilities shall be utilized before state hospitals are used. 

(b) Nothing in this section shall prevent a county from restructuring its systems of care in the manner it believes will provide the best overall care.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 89, Sec. 125.   Effective June 30, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

5652.7.

A county shall have only 60 days from the date of submission of an application to review and certify or deny an application to establish a new mental health care provider. If an application requires review by the State Department of Health Care Services, the department shall also have only 60 days from the date of submission of the application to review and certify or deny an application to establish a new mental health care provider.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 123.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

5653.

(a) Optimum use shall be made of appropriate local public and private organizations, community professional personnel, and state agencies. Optimum use shall also be made of federal, state, county, and private funds that may be available for mental health planning.

(b) In order that maximum utilization be made of federal and other funds made available to the Department of Rehabilitation, the Department of Rehabilitation may serve as a contractual provider under the provisions of a county plan of vocational rehabilitation services for persons with mental health disorders.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 101.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

5653.1.

In conducting evaluation, planning, and research activities, counties may contract with public or private agencies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 125.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

5654.

In order to serve the increasing needs of children and adolescents with mental and emotional problems, county mental health programs may use funds for the purposes of consultation and training.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 126.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

5655.

All departments of state government and all local public agencies shall cooperate with county officials to assist them in mental health planning. The State Department of Health Care Services shall, upon request and with available staff, provide consultation services to the local mental health directors, local governing bodies, and local mental health advisory boards.

If the Director of Health Care
 Services considers any county to be failing, in a substantial manner, to comply with any provision of this code or any regulation, the director shall order the county to appear at a hearing, before the director or the director’s designee, to show cause why the department should not take action as set forth in this section. The county shall be given at least 20 days’ notice of the hearing. The director shall consider the case on the record established at the hearing and make final findings and decision.

If the director determines that there is or has been a failure, in a substantial manner, on the part of the county to
 comply with any provision of this code or any regulations, and that administrative sanctions are necessary, the department may invoke any, or any combination of, the following sanctions:

(a) Withhold part or all of state mental health funds from the county.

(b) Require the county to enter into negotiations for the purpose of ensuring county
 compliance with
 those laws and regulations.

(c) Bring an action in mandamus or any other action in court as may be appropriate to compel compliance. Any action filed in accordance with this section shall be entitled to a preference in setting a date for a hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 127.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

5657.

(a) The private organization or private nonprofit organization awarded a contract with the county agency to supply mental health services under this part shall provide an invoice to the county for the amount of the payment due within 60 days of the date the services are supplied, as long as that date is at least 60 days from the date the county has received distribution of mental health funds from the state.

(b) Any county that, without reasonable cause, fails to make any payment within 60 days of the required payment date to a private organization or private nonprofit organization awarded a contract with the county agency to supply mental health services under this part, for an undisputed claim which was properly executed by the claimant and submitted to the county, shall pay a penalty of 0.10 percent of the amount due, per day, from the 61st day after the required payment date.

(c) For the purposes of this section, “required payment date” means any of the following:

(1) The date on which payment is due under the terms of the contract.
